Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB384.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3503(d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3503. Criminal trespass.* * *(b.4) Evaluation for gambling disorder.--(1) Upon conviction or admission to Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition or another pretrial diversion program of a person for an offense committed under subsection (b), where the person's name is included on a self-exclusion list and the offense was committed at a licensed facility or a video gaming area, the court may direct that the person be evaluated in a manner deemed appropriate by the court to 12345678910111213141516171819 determine:(i) if the person has a gambling disorder; and(ii) whether there is a need for counseling or treatment as part of the sentence or preadjudication disposition.(2) The evaluation shall be conducted by a clinician appointed by the court and shall include recommendations for levels of care, continuing care and monitoring.* * *(d) [Definition.--As used in this section, the term "school grounds" means any] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Establishment licensee." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 3102 (relating to definitions)."Licensed facility." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions)."Licensed gaming entity." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103."School grounds." Any building of or grounds of any elementary or secondary publicly funded educational institution, any elementary or secondary private school licensed by the Department of Education, any elementary or secondary parochial school, any certified day-care center or any licensed preschool program."Self-exclusion list." The lists established and maintained by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board under 4 Pa.C.S. §§ 1516 (relating to list of persons self excluded from gaming activities) and 3903 (relating to self-exclusion) or self-exclusion lists maintained by a licensed gaming entity which 20250HB0384PN0349 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meets the minimum criteria stated in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1516 or by an establishment licensee which meets the minimum criteria stated in 4 Pa.C.S. § 3903."Video gaming area." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 3102.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0384PN0349 - 3 - 12345